Illinois, session 104th, HB4622.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wrongful Tree Cutting Act is amended by 5adding Section 8 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 185/8 new)7    Sec. 8. State tree encroaching on neighboring farmland. 8    (a) If a tree along a fence line abutting a roadway is on a 9property that was formerly used as farm land and is now owned 10or managed by the Department of Transportation and encroaches 11onto, over, or beneath a neighboring parcel that is currently 12used for farming, the parcel owner may petition the Department 13of Transportation to remove the tree if the tree's growth is 14affecting crop growth or otherwise hindering the parcel 15owner's economic use of the land to the extent that the problem 16can only be effectively remediated by removing the tree.17    (b) The neighboring parcel owner is permitted to remove 18the tree at the parcel owner's own expense without any 19obligation to compensate the Department of Transportation for 20the tree's removal if, within 60 days of a request made under 21this Section, the Department of Transportation does not either 22remove the tree, grant the neighboring parcel owner permission 23to remove the tree, or explain in writing why the tree cannot   HB4622- 2 -LRB104 17649 JRC 31080 b1in good faith be removed within 60 days. If the Department of 2Transportation cannot in good faith remove the tree within 60 3days, the maximum delay allowed is an additional 60 days for it 4to remove the tree.5    (c) If a neighboring parcel owner has been given authority 6to remove a tree under this Section, the parcel owner is immune 7from a claim of damages to the property, except in the cases of 8gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.